Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.100

Additional penalties.

Any person who willfully disobeys an off-limits order issued under this chapter shall be subject to criminal penalties as provided in this chapter and may also be found in contempt of court and subject to penalties under chapter 7.21 RCW.

[ 1999 c 143 s 47; 1989 c 271 s 222.]